Maryland, session 2026, HB0528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0528*

HOUSE BILL 528
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(mm) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Correctional officer” means an individual who:
1. was employed in:
A. a State correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
B. a local correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
C. a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human
Services Article; or
D. a facility of the United States that is equivalent to a State
or local correctional facility or a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human Services
Article; and
2. is eligible to receive retirement income attributable to the
individual’s employment under item 1 of this subparagraph.
(iii) “Emergency services personnel” means emergency medical
technicians or paramedics.
(iv) “Employee retirement system” has the meaning stated under §
10–209(a) of this subtitle.
(v) 1. “Public safety employee” means an individual who is a
retired correctional officer, law enforcement officer, or fire, rescue, or emergency services
personnel of the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State.
2. “PUBLIC SAFETY EMPLOYEE” INCLUDES AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A RETIRED FIRE, RESCUE, OR EMERGENCY SERVICES
PERSONNEL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes the first
$15,000 of income from an employee retirement system that is attributable to service as a
public safety employee, if the income is received by an individual who is at least 55 years
old on the last day of the taxable year.

HOUSE BILL 528 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.